Yamls/Pron-kynym-nibudj_gt-norm.yaml
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: кынымныткӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: кынымнытӧкӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: кынымнытлӧнкӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: кынымнытліськӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: кынымнытлӧкӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: кынымнаныткӧ 
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxPl2: кынымныткӧткӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxPl2: [кынымныткӧтӧг, кынымкӧтӧгьяныт, кынымтӧгьяныткӧ] 
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: [кынымныткӧла, кынымнытлакӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: [кынымныткӧся, кынымнытсякӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: кыныманыткӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: кынымсиныткӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: кыныманыткӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [кынымныткӧлань, кынымнытланькӧ, кынымкӧланяныт, кынымланяныткӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [кынымныткӧсянь, кынымнытсянькӧ, кынымкӧсяняныт, кынымсяняныткӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: [кынымӧттяныткӧ, кынымӧттиныткӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: [кынымӧдззаныткӧ, кынымӧдззиныткӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: [кынымныткӧви, кынымнытвикӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: [кынымкӧланяныт, кынымланяныткӧ, кынымныткӧланьын, кынымнытланьынкӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: [кынымкӧланьсиныт, кынымланьсиныткӧ, кынымныткӧланись, кынымнытланиськӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: [кынымкӧланяныт, кынымланяныткӧ, кынымныткӧланьӧ, кынымнытланьӧкӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: [кынымкӧланьсяняныт, кынымланьсяняныткӧ, кынымныткӧланьсянь, кынымнытланьсянькӧ] 
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: [кынымкӧланьӧттяныт, кынымкӧланьӧттиныт, кынымланьӧттяныткӧ, кынымланьӧттиныткӧ, кынымныткӧланьӧт, кынымнытланьӧткӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: [кынымкӧланьӧдззаныт, кынымкӧланьӧдззиныт, кынымланьӧдззаныткӧ, кынымланьӧдззиныткӧ, кынымныткӧланьӧдз, кынымнытланьӧдзкӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: [кынымныткӧланьви, кынымнытланьвикӧ]


    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: кынымныскӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: кынымнысӧкӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: кынымныслӧнкӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: кынымнысліськӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: кынымныслӧкӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: кынымнаныскӧ 
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxPl3: кынымныскӧткӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxPl3: [кынымныскӧтӧг, кынымкӧтӧгьяныс, кынымтӧгьяныскӧ] 
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: [кынымныскӧла, кынымныслакӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: [кынымныскӧся, кынымныссякӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: кыныманыскӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: кынымсиныскӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: кыныманыскӧ
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [кынымныскӧлань, кынымнысланькӧ, кынымкӧланяныс, кынымланяныскӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [кынымныскӧсянь, кынымныссянькӧ, кынымкӧсяняныс, кынымсяняныскӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [кынымӧттяныскӧ, кынымӧттиныскӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [кынымӧдззаныскӧ, кынымӧдззиныскӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: [кынымныскӧви, кынымнысвикӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: [кынымкӧланяныс, кынымланяныскӧ, кынымныскӧланьын, кынымнысланьынкӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: [кынымкӧланьсиныс, кынымланьсиныскӧ, кынымныскӧланись, кынымнысланиськӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: [кынымкӧланяныс, кынымланяныскӧ, кынымныскӧланьӧ, кынымнысланьӧкӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [кынымкӧланьсяняныс, кынымланьсяняныскӧ, кынымныскӧланьсянь, кынымнысланьсянькӧ] 
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [кынымкӧланьӧттяныс, кынымкӧланьӧттиныс, кынымланьӧттяныскӧ, кынымланьӧттиныскӧ, кынымныскӧланьӧт, кынымнысланьӧткӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [кынымкӧланьӧдззаныс, кынымкӧланьӧдззиныс, кынымланьӧдззаныскӧ, кынымланьӧдззиныскӧ, кынымныскӧланьӧдз, кынымнысланьӧдзкӧ]
    кынымкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: [кынымныскӧланьви, кынымнысланьвикӧ]


##Pronoun – кыным: # Interrogative Pronoun 'Kuinka paljon / Сколько'
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom: кыным
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Cop+Sg: кыныма
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Cop+Pl: кынымаӧсь
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc: кынымӧ
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen: кынымлӧн
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl: кынымлісь
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat: кынымлӧ
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ins: кынымӧн 
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com: кынымкӧт
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Car: кынымтӧг
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cns: кынымла
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cmpr: кынымся
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine: кынымын
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela: кынымись
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill: кынымӧ
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Apr: кынымлань
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Egr: кынымсянь
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Prl: кынымӧт
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerI: кынымӧдз
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerII: кынымви
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIne: кынымланьын
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEla: кынымланись
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIll: кынымланьӧ
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEgr: кынымланьсянь
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprPrl: кынымланьӧт
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerI: кынымланьӧдз
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerII: кынымланьви


    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: кынымӧ
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: кынымӧс
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: кынымӧлӧн
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: кынымӧлісь
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: кынымӧлӧ
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: кынымнам 
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com+PxSg1: кынымӧкӧт
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Car+PxSg1: [кынымӧтӧг, кынымтӧгьям] 
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: кынымӧла
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: кынымӧся
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: кынымам
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: кынымсим
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: кынымам
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [кынымӧлань, кынымланям]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [кынымӧсянь, кынымсяням]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [кынымӧттям, кынымӧттим]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxSg1: [кынымӧдззам, кынымӧдззим]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxSg1: кынымӧви
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: [кынымланям, кынымӧланьын]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: [кынымланьсим, кынымӧланись]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: [кынымланям, кынымӧланьӧ]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [кынымӧланьсянь, кынымланьсяням] 
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: [кынымӧланьӧт, кынымланьӧттям, кынымланьӧттим]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg1: [кынымӧланьӧдз, кынымланьӧдззам, кынымланьӧдззим]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg1: кынымӧланьви


    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: кынымыт
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: кынымтӧ
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: кынымытлӧн
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: кынымытлісь
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: кынымытлӧ
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: кынымнат 
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com+PxSg2: кынымыткӧт
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Car+PxSg2: [кынымыттӧг, кынымтӧгьят]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: кынымытла
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: кынымытся
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: кынымат
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: кынымсит
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: кынымат
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: [кынымытлань, кынымланят]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [кынымытсянь, кынымсянят]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: [кынымӧттят, кынымӧттит]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxSg2: [кынымӧдззат, кынымӧдззит]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxSg2: кынымытви
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: [кынымланят, кынымытланьын]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: [кынымланьсит, кынымытланись]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: [кынымланят, кынымытланьӧ]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: [кынымытланьсянь, кынымланьсянят] 
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: [кынымытланьӧт, кынымланьӧттят, кынымланьӧттит]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg2: [кынымытланьӧдз, кынымланьӧдззат, кынымланьӧдззит]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg2: кынымытланьви


    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: кынымыс
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: кынымсӧ
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: кынымыслӧн
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: кынымыслісь
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: кынымыслӧ
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: кынымнас 
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com+PxSg3: кынымыскӧт
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Car+PxSg3: [кынымыстӧг, кынымтӧгьяс]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: кынымысла
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: кынымысся
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: кынымас
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: кынымсис
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: кынымас
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [кынымыслань, кынымланяс]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [кынымыссянь, кынымсяняс]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [кынымӧттяс, кынымӧттис]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [кынымӧдззас, кынымӧдззис]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: кынымысви
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: [кынымланяс, кынымысланьын]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: [кынымланьсис, кынымысланись]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: [кынымланяс, кынымысланьӧ]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [кынымысланьсянь, кынымланьсяняс] 
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [кынымысланьӧт, кынымланьӧттяс, кынымланьӧттис]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [кынымысланьӧдз, кынымланьӧдззас, кынымланьӧдззис]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: кынымысланьви


    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: кынымным
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: кынымнымӧс
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: кынымнымлӧн
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: кынымнымлісь
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: кынымнымлӧ
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: кынымнаным 
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com+PxPl1: кынымнымкӧт
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Car+PxPl1: [кынымнымтӧг, кынымтӧгьяным]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: кынымнымла
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: кынымнымся
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: кыныманым
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: кынымсиным
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: кыныманым
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [кынымнымлань, кынымланяным]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [кынымнымсянь, кынымсяняным]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [кынымӧттяным, кынымӧттиным]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: [кынымӧдззаным, кынымӧдззиным]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: кынымнымви
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: [кынымланяным, кынымнымланьын]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: [кынымланьсиным, кынымнымланись]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: [кынымланяным, кынымнымланьӧ]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: [кынымнымланьсянь, кынымланьсяняным] 
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: [кынымнымланьӧт, кынымланьӧттяным, кынымланьӧттиным]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: [кынымнымланьӧдз, кынымланьӧдззаным, кынымланьӧдззиным]
    кыным+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: кынымнымланьви
